Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.04.060

Common law to supplement statute.

The provisions of the common law relating to the commission of crime and the punishment thereof, insofar as not inconsistent with the Constitution and statutes of this state, shall supplement all penal statutes of this state and all persons offending against the same shall be tried in the courts of this state having jurisdiction of the offense.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.04.060.]